Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.48.100

Malicious mischief—"Physical damage" defined.

For the purposes of RCW 9A.48.070 through 9A.48.090 inclusive:

(1) "Physical damage," in addition to its ordinary meaning, shall include the total or partial alteration, damage, obliteration, or erasure of records, information, data, computer programs, or their computer representations, which are recorded for use in computers or the impairment, interruption, or interference with the use of such records, information, data, or computer programs, or the impairment, interruption, or interference with the use of any computer or services provided by computers. "Physical damage" also includes any diminution in the value of any property as the consequence of an act and the cost to repair any physical damage;

(2) If more than one item of property is physically damaged as a result of a common scheme or plan by a person and the physical damage to the property would, when considered separately, constitute mischief in the third degree because of value, then the value of the damages may be aggregated in one count. If the sum of the value of all the physical damages exceeds two hundred fifty dollars, the defendant may be charged with and convicted of malicious mischief in the second degree.

[ 2013 c 322 s 1; 1984 c 273 s 4; 1981 c 260 s 2. Prior: 1979 ex.s. c 244 s 11; 1979 c 145 s 3; 1977 ex.s. c 174 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.48.100.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1979 ex.s. c 244: See RCW 9A.44.902.

Action by owner of stolen livestock: RCW 4.24.320.

Computer trespass: RCW 9A.90.040 and 9A.90.050.